Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1265.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 11 O.S. 2021, Section 14-106, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 14-106. No ordinance having any subject other than the
appropriation of monies shall be in force unless published or posted
within fifteen (15) thirty (30) days after its passage. Every
municipal ordinance shall be published at least once in full, except
as provided for in Section 14-107 of this title. When publishing
the ordinance, the publisher or managing officer of the newspaper
shall prefix to the ordinance a line in brackets stating the date of
publication as “Published _______”, giving the month, day, and year
of publication.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

ENGR. S. B. NO. 1265 Page 1

Passed the Senate the 17th day of February, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives















ENGR. S. B. NO. 1265 Page 2